District of Columbia statutes.
21-905

Superintendent to receive persons committed or apprehended under sections 21-902 and 21-903.

The Superintendent of Saint Elizabeths Hospital shall receive for observation and diagnosis a person apprehended or committed as provided by sections 21-902 and 21-903 for the periods therein prescribed, unless the person is sooner discharged or returned to his home or to the State of his residence.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 764, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-905.
1973 Ed., § 21-905.